Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.096

Budget detail—Designated state agencies—Federal receipts reporting requirements.

(1) As used in this section:

(a) "Designated state agency" means the department of social and health services, the department of health, the health care authority, the department of commerce, the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of children, youth, and families.

(b) "Federal receipts" means the federal financial assistance, as defined in 31 U.S.C. Sec. 7501 on September 28, 2013, that is reported as part of a single audit.

(c) "Single audit" is as defined in 31 U.S.C. Sec. 7501 on September 28, 2013.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a designated state agency shall prepare as part of the agency's biennial budget submittal under this chapter a report that:

(a) Reports the aggregate value of federal receipts the designated state agency estimated for the ensuing biennium;

(b) Calculates the percentage of the designated state agency's total budget for the ensuing biennium that constitutes federal receipts that the designated state agency received; and

(c) Develops plans for operating the designated state agency if there is a reduction of:

(i) Five percent or more in the federal receipts that the designated state agency receives; and

(ii) Twenty-five percent or more in the federal receipts that the designated state agency receives.

(3) The report required by subsection (2) of this section prepared by the superintendent of public instruction shall include the information required by subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this section for each school district within the state.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 227; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 32 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.